Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [257E.28] EXCEPTION; ADOPTION REQUIRED. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding sections 257E.15 to 257E.27, an intended parent who is not biologically related to the child and does not give birth to the child is not a parent of the child and must not be adjudicated as the parent of the child, unless the intended parent adopts the child pursuant to chapter 259. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to births on or after that date. new text end